Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.040

Examination fee.

Every applicant for license examination under this chapter shall pay the sum determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280 before the examination is attempted.

[ 1996 c 191 s 42; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 413; 1979 c 90 s 7; 1971 ex.s. c 201 s 1; 1963 c 38 s 2; 1949 c 153 s 1; 1935 c 98 s 4; 1909 c 213 s 5; 1899 c 121 s 10; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10135.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 201: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 ex.s. c 201 s 9.]